pt-PT: Mecanismo de travão de estacionamento compatível: Travão de estacionamento eletrónico (EPB) integrado; Travão de estacionamento mecânico (cabo) integrado; Não aplicável/sem travão de estacionamento; Outro
es: Mecanismo de freno de estacionamiento compatible: Freno de estacionamiento electrónico (EPB) integrado; Freno de estacionamiento mecánico (cable) integrado; No aplicable/sin freno de estacionamiento; Otro
bg-BG: Съвместим механизъм на ръчната спирачка: Интегрирана електронна ръчна спирачка (EPB); Интегрирана механична ръчна спирачка (с жило); Не е приложимо / няма ръчна спирачка; Друго
da: Kompatibel parkeringsbremsemekanisme: Integreret elektronisk parkeringsbremse (EPB); Integreret mekanisk parkeringsbremse (kabel); Ikke relevant / ingen parkeringsbremse; Andet
it: Meccanismo del freno di stazionamento compatibile: Freno di stazionamento elettronico integrato (EPB); Freno di stazionamento meccanico integrato (cavo); Non applicabile / nessun freno di stazionamento; Altro
el: Συμβατός μηχανισμός χειρόφρενου: Ενσωματωμένο ηλεκτρονικό χειρόφρενο (EPB); Ενσωματωμένο μηχανικό χειρόφρενο (ντίζα); Δεν ισχύει / χωρίς χειρόφρενο; Άλλο
fi: Yhteensopiva seisontajarrumekanismi: Integroitu sähköinen seisontajarru (EPB); Integroitu mekaaninen seisontajarru (vaijeri); Ei sovellu / ei seisontajarrua; Muu
en: Compatible parking brake mechanism: Integrated electronic parking brake (EPB); Integrated mechanical parking brake (cable); Not applicable / no parking brake; Other
nb: Kompatibel parkeringsbremsemekanisme: Integrert elektronisk parkeringsbrems (EPB); Integrert mekanisk parkeringsbrems (kabel); Ikke relevant / ingen parkeringsbrems; Annet
pl: Kompatybilny mechanizm hamulca postojowego: Zintegrowany elektroniczny hamulec postojowy (EPB); Zintegrowany mechaniczny hamulec postojowy (linka); Nie dotyczy / brak hamulca postojowego; Inne
ro-RO: Mecanism de frână de parcare compatibil: Frână de parcare electronică integrată (EPB); Frână de parcare mecanică integrată (cablu); Nu se aplică / fără frână de parcare; Altele
ja: 互換性のあるパーキングブレーキメカニズム: 統合型電動パーキングブレーキ (EPB); 統合型機械式パーキングブレーキ (ケーブル); 該当なし / パーキングブレーキなし; その他
ru: Совместимый механизм стояночного тормоза: Встроенный электрический стояночный тормоз (EPB); Встроенный механический стояночный тормоз (тросовый); Неприменимо / без стояночного тормоза; Другое
hu: Kompatibilis kézifék-mechanizmus: Integrált elektronikus rögzítőfék (EPB); Integrált mechanikus rögzítőfék (bovdenes); Nem alkalmazható / nincs rögzítőfék; Egyéb
cs: Kompatibilní mechanismus parkovací brzdy: Integrovaná elektronická parkovací brzda (EPB); Integrovaná mechanická parkovací brzda (lanovod); Nelze použít / bez parkovací brzdy; Jiné
zh-TW: 相容駐車煞車機構: 整合式電子手煞車 (EPB); 整合式機械手煞車 (鋼索); 不適用 / 無手煞車; 其他
sk-SK: Kompatibilný mechanizmus parkovacej brzdy: Integrovaná elektronická parkovacia brzda (EPB); Integrovaná mechanická parkovacia brzda (lanko); Neuplatňuje sa/bez parkovacej brzdy; Iné
tr: Uyumlu park freni mekanizması: Entegre elektronik el freni (EPB); Entegre mekanik el freni (kablolu); Geçerli değil / el freni yok; Diğer
de: Kompatibler Feststellbremsmechanismus: Integrierte elektronische Parkbremse (EPB); Integrierte mechanische Parkbremse (Seilzug); Nicht zutreffend/keine Parkbremse; Sonstige
lt-LT: Suderinamas stovėjimo stabdžio mechanizmas: Integruotas elektroninis stovėjimo stabdys (EPB); Integruotas mechaninis stovėjimo stabdys (trosas); Netaikoma / nėra stovėjimo stabdžio; Kita
sv: Kompatibel parkeringsbromsmekanism: Integrerad elektrisk parkeringsbroms (EPB); Integrerad mekanisk parkeringsbroms (kabel); Ej tillämpligt/ingen parkeringsbroms; Övrigt
pt-BR: Mecanismo de freio de estacionamento compatível: Freio de estacionamento eletrônico integrado (EPB); Freio de estacionamento mecânico integrado (cabo); Não aplicável/sem freio de estacionamento; Outro
zh-CN: 适配的驻车制动机构: 集成式电子驻车制动器 (EPB); 集成式机械驻车制动器（拉线式）; 不适用/无驻车制动器; 其他
th: กลไกเบรกมือที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: เบรกมือไฟฟ้าในตัว (EPB); เบรกมือกลไกในตัว (สายเคเบิล); ไม่เกี่ยวข้อง / ไม่มีเบรกมือ; อื่นๆ
fr: Compatibilité de mécanisme de frein de stationnement: Frein de stationnement électronique intégré (EPB); Frein de stationnement mécanique intégré (câble); Non applicable / sans frein de stationnement; Autre
ko: 호환 주차 브레이크 메커니즘: 통합형 전자식 주차 브레이크(EPB); 통합형 기계식 주차 브레이크(케이블); 해당 없음/주차 브레이크 없음; 기타
hr-HR: Kompatibilni mehanizam parkirne kočnice: Integrirana elektronička parkirna kočnica (EPB); Integrirana mehanička parkirna kočnica (sajla); Nije primjenjivo / bez parkirne kočnice; Ostalo
nl: Compatibel parkeerremmechanisme: Geïntegreerde elektronische parkeerrem (EPB); Geïntegreerde mechanische parkeerrem (kabel); Niet van toepassing / geen parkeerrem; Overig
sl-SI: Združljiv mehanizem parkirne zavore: Vgrajena elektronska parkirna zavora (EPB); Vgrajena mehanska parkirna zavora (kabel); Ni primerno/brez parkirne zavore; Drugo
vi: Cơ chế phanh đỗ tương thích: Phanh đỗ điện tử tích hợp (EPB); Phanh đỗ cơ học tích hợp (dây cáp); Không áp dụng / không có phanh đỗ xe; Khác